Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-256
Home barber services permit; issuance.

(1) A barber shop may employ licensed barbers, according to the licensed activities of the barber shop, to perform home barber services by obtaining a home barber services permit.

(2) In order to obtain a home barber services permit from the board, an applicant shall:

(a) Hold a current, active barber shop license; and

(b) Submit a complete application at least ten days before the proposed date for beginning home barbering services.

(3) The board shall issue a home barber services permit to each applicant meeting the requirements set forth in this section.

Laws 2020, LB755, § 26.